Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Chapter 7

Leases

66-7-101. Writing required for long term leases — Authentication and registration.

Leases for more than three (3) years shall be in writing, and, to be valid against any person other than the lessor, the lessor's heirs and devisees, and persons having actual notice thereof, shall be proved and registered as provided in chapters 22-24 of this title.

Code 1858, § 2002 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 12, § 4); Shan., § 3663; Code 1932, § 7191; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-701.

Cross-References. Assignment of interest in lease, §66-26-116.

Landlord not liable for tax on leasehold, §67-5-2102.

Landlord's crop lien, title 66, ch. 12.

Minimum health standards for rental property, title 68, ch. 111.

Statute of frauds, §29-2-101.

Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, title 66, ch. 28.

Writings eligible for registration, §66-24-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 8-404, 8-407, 8-432.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 11 Tenn. Juris., Evidence, § 130; 13 Tenn. Juris., Frauds, Statute of, § 16; 17 Tenn. Juris., Landlord and Tenant, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

66-7-102. Effect of injury to buildings.

Where any building which is leased or occupied is destroyed or so injured by the elements, or any other cause, as to be untenantable and unfit for occupancy, and no express agreement to the contrary has been made in writing, the lessee or occupant may, if the destruction or injury occurred without fault or neglect by the lessee, surrender possession of the premises, without liability to the lessor or owner for rent for the time subsequent to the surrender.

A covenant or promise by the lessee to leave or restore the premises in good repair shall not have the effect to bind the lessee to erect or pay for such buildings as may be so destroyed, unless in respect of the matter of loss or destruction there was neglect or fault on the lessee's part, or unless the lessee has expressly stipulated in writing to be so bound.

Code 1932, §§ 7619, 7620; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 64-702, 64-703.

Cross-References. Failure of tenant to maintain dwelling, §66-28-506.

Fire or casualty damage, §66-28-503.

Maintenance by landlord, §66-28-304.

Maintenance by tenant, §66-28-401.

Wrongful failure to supply essential services, §66-28-502.

Law Reviews.

Avoiding Lease-Drafting Pitfalls (C. Dewees Berry IV), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 11 (1983).

66-7-103. Maximum term of oil and gas leases.

Any lease of oil or natural gas rights or any other conveyance of any kind separating such rights from the freehold estate of land shall expire at the end of ten (10) years from the date executed, unless, at the end of such ten (10) years, natural gas or oil is being produced from such land for commercial purposes. If, at any time after the ten-year period, commercial production of oil or natural gas is terminated for a period of six (6) months, all such rights shall revert to the owner of the estate out of which the leasehold estate was carved. No assignment or agreement to waive this subsection (a) shall be valid or enforceable.

This subsection (a) shall not be construed to affect the validity or the expiration date of any lease or other instrument executed prior to March 16, 1939, nor shall it be construed to affect the validity or the expiration date of any lease, conveyance or other instrument insofar as it may convey underground natural gas storage rights, or otherwise separate such rights from the freehold estate, whenever executed.

For a period of one (1) year after the ten-year period provided for in subsection (a) has expired, “production,” as used in subsection (a), includes the actual production of minerals under any lease hereof or by the owner of any mineral interest, or when operations are being conducted by any owner of a lease or mineral interest for injection, withdrawal, storage, or disposal of water, gas, or other fluid substances, or when rentals or royalties are being paid by the owner of such leases for the purpose of delaying or enjoying the use of exercise of the rights thereunder or when the same is being carried out on any tract with which such leasehold interest may be unitized or pooled for production purposes. During the one-year period provided for in this subsection (b), any act by the owner of any leasehold or mineral interest pursuant to or authorized by the instrument creating such interest shall be effective to continue in force all rights granted by such instrument, notwithstanding subsection (a).

This subsection (b) applies to a drilling unit of no more than the number of acres provided for under the pooling clause of the lease and provided there is compliance with the rules of the Tennessee oil and gas board as set forth in paragraph 1040-2-4-01 of such rules (well spacing).

Acts 1939, ch. 89, §§ 1-3; C. Supp. 1950, § 7620.1 (Williams, § 7620.1); Acts 1963, ch. 69, § 1; 1978, ch. 945, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-704.

Cross-References. Printed contract forms for products extracted from or beneath the earth, §47-50-110.

Regulation of production, title 60, ch. 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-1112.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mines and Minerals, §§ 11, 13.

Law Reviews.

Duration of Oil and Gas Leases in Tennessee — Commentary on Section 66-7-103 of the Tennessee Code (Thomas B. Preston), 3 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 13 (1972).

66-7-104. Physically disabled persons' access to housing accommodations.

Totally or partially blind persons and other physically disabled persons shall be entitled to full and equal access, as other members of the general public, to all housing accommodations offered for rent, lease or compensation in this state, subject to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable to all persons.

“Housing accommodations” means any real property or portion thereof which is used to occupy or is intended, arranged or designed to be used or occupied, as the home, residence or sleeping place of one (1) or more human beings, but does not include any single family residence, the occupants of which rent, lease or furnish for compensation not more than one (1) room in the residence.

Nothing in this section shall require any person renting, leasing, or providing for compensation any real property to modify such property in any way or manner or to provide a higher degree of care for a totally blind or partially blind person or other physically disabled person than for a person who is not blind or disabled.

Notwithstanding subdivision (c)(1), any person renting, leasing, or providing for compensation any real property that is three (3) or more stories tall shall give priority in access to housing units on floors one (1) and two (2) of such property to physically disabled persons whose disability would prevent such persons from having reasonable access to units located on higher floors; provided, that the person shall not be required to seek out physically disabled occupants or forego occupancy of the unit for any period of time if a physically disabled occupant is not available. Nothing in this subdivision (c)(2) shall prevent the lessor from using or applying other factors in determining whether or not to rent to a disabled person.

A violation of subdivision (c)(2)(A) is a Class C misdemeanor punishable only by a fine not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

Every totally blind or partially blind person who has a guide dog, or who obtains a guide dog, shall be entitled to full and equal access to all housing accommodations included within subsection (a) or any accommodations provided for in §§ 71-4-201, 71-4-202 and this section, and such person shall not be required to pay extra compensation for such guide dog, but shall be liable for any damages done to the premises by such animal.

Acts 1972, ch. 480, § 3; T.C.A., § 64-705; Acts 2005, ch. 215, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

66-7-105. Adult bookstores and movie houses — Leases unenforceable.

Hereby declared against public policy and unenforceable are all leases or rental contracts, whether or not in writing, on real estate or buildings which are used for the purpose of sale, display, distribution or exhibition of obscene live performances or obscene material of any other kind including, but not limited to, the business of operating a store or house for the sale, or the commercial display, distribution or exhibition of an obscene book or magazine or other printed matter, motion pictures or peep shows. Occupants claiming the right to possess, use or occupy any building or real estate because of such an unenforceable lease or rental contract shall be immediately subject to eviction for unlawful detainer thereof in a suit by the owner of the building or real estate or by the state or by the county or by the incorporated municipality in which the building or real estate is located. Any person, firm, partnership or corporation that knowingly leases or rents any real estate or building to any person, firm, partnership or corporation for such purpose shall not have standing to use the courts or legal processes to enforce such lease or rental contract or to collect rentals or any other consideration because of such an unenforceable lease or rental contract.

Acts 1973, ch. 184, § 2; T.C.A., § 64-706; Acts 1996, ch. 1071, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 1071, § 2 provided that this section shall apply to leases or rental contracts to which this section applies, entered into or renewed on or after May 15, 1996.

66-7-106. Leasing to blind persons.

Any legally blind person in this state whose loss of sight necessitates a guide dog for mobility purposes, which has been obtained from a recognized school of training for such purposes, may not be denied the right to lease an apartment or other types of dwellings as a consequence of having a guide dog.

Because the guide dog is essential to the mobility of its master, no deposit may be required to be paid, with respect to the dog, by the legally blind person to the owner, manager, landlord or agent of any such attendance.

No restrictions may be imposed upon the legally blind person regarding the whereabouts of the animal so long as its master is in attendance.

Any owner, manager, landlord or agent who refuses to lease living space to any legally blind person because of a guide dog, or violates this section, commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1982, ch. 951, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Physically disabled persons' access to housing accommodations, §66-7-104.

66-7-107. Termination for knowing controlled substance or prostitution violations.

An occupant's tenancy may be terminated where the premises or the area immediately surrounding the premises is knowingly used or occupied in whole or in part to violate § 39-13-513, § 39-13-515 or § 39-17-417.

The identity of any person who provides evidence or other information that results in an eviction or other termination of residency pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential and shall not be made a public record by the law enforcement agency or the district attorney general.

The district attorney general for the district in which the real property is located may serve personally upon the owner or landlord of the premises so used or occupied, or upon the owner's or landlord's agent, or may send by registered return receipt or certified return receipt mail, a written notice requiring the owner or landlord to inform such district attorney general in writing of the owner's or landlord's intent to diligently and in good faith seek the eviction of the tenants or occupants so using or occupying the premises. If the owner or landlord or the owner's or landlord's agent does not so inform such district attorney general in writing within five (5) days of receiving written notice or, having so done, does not in good faith diligently prosecute such eviction, the district attorney general may bring a proceeding under this section in general sessions court, specifically including any general sessions court designated as an environmental court, or circuit court for such eviction as though the district attorney general was the owner or landlord of the premises, and such proceeding shall have precedence over any similar proceeding thereafter brought by such owner or landlord or to a proceeding previously brought by such owner or landlord and not prosecuted diligently and in good faith. The person in possession of the property and the owner or landlord shall be made respondents in such a proceeding.

A court granting relief pursuant to this section may order, in addition to any other costs provided by law, the payment by the respondent or respondents of reasonable attorney fees and the prepaid costs of the proceeding to the district attorney general. In such cases, multiple respondents are jointly and severally liable for any payment so ordered. Any costs collected shall be remitted to the office of the district attorney general, and any attorney fees collected shall be remitted to the general fund of the county where the proceeding occurred.

A proceeding brought under this section for possession of the premises does not preclude the owner or landlord from recovering monetary damages from the tenants or occupants of such premises in a civil action.

The owner or landlord of the real property is obligated to pay the costs required to physically remove the tenant's personal belongings from the rental property in compliance with an eviction order of the court in all eviction proceedings brought under this section by the district attorney general; such costs not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for each such eviction order.

Acts 1997, ch. 203, § 1; 1998, ch. 703, § 1; 1998, ch. 885, § 1; 1999, ch. 319, § 1; 2000, ch. 591, § 1; 2003, ch. 133, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail, §1-3-111.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

66-7-108. Commercial lease disclosure statement — Remedies for misrepresentation.

At the request of a prospective tenant, the owner of commercial or industrial real property where the commercial property space is one thousand five hundred square feet (1,500 sq. ft.) or less, and the industrial real property is five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.) or less, shall furnish to such prospective tenant a signed disclosure statement detailing the extent to which such real property is understood by the owner to be in compliance with local and state fire, plumbing, and electrical codes for a building of the type under construction. If, at the time such disclosure is made, an item of information required to be disclosed is unknown or not available to the owner, the owner may state that such information is unknown.

If the owner knowingly misrepresents information required to be disclosed by this section, the lessee's remedies, at the option of the lessee, for such misrepresentation on the disclosure statement shall be either:

An action for actual damages suffered as a result of known defects existing in the property as of the date of execution of the lease. Any action brought under this subdivision (b)(1) shall be commenced within one (1) year from the date the lessee received the disclosure statement or the date of occupancy, whichever occurs first; or

Termination of the lease.

Nothing in this section shall affect other remedies at law or equity otherwise available against an owner in the event of an owner's intentional or willful misrepresentation of the condition of the subject property.

Acts 1999, ch. 122, §§ 1-3.

66-7-109. Notice of termination by landlord.

Except as provided in this section, fourteen (14) days' notice by a landlord shall be sufficient notice of termination of tenancy for the purpose of eviction of a residential tenant, if the termination of tenancy is for one of the following reasons:

Tenant neglect or refusal to pay rent that is due and is in arrears, upon demand;

Damage beyond normal wear and tear to the premises by the tenant, members of the household, or guests; or

The tenant or any other person on the premises with the tenant's consent willfully or intentionally commits a violent act or behaves in a manner which constitutes or threatens to be a real and present danger to the health, safety or welfare of the life or property of other tenants, the landlord, the landlord's representatives or other persons on the premises.

If the notice of termination of tenancy is given for one of the reasons set out in subdivision (a)(1)(A) or (a)(1)(B) and the breach is remediable by repairs or the payment of rent or damages or otherwise and the tenant adequately remedies the breach prior to the date specified in the notice from the landlord, the rental agreement will not terminate. If substantially the same act or omission which constituted a prior noncompliance of which notice was given recurs within six (6) months, the landlord may terminate the rental agreement upon at least fourteen (14) days' written notice specifying the breach and the date of termination of the rental agreement.

For all other defaults in the lease agreement, a thirty (30) day termination notice from the date such notice is given by the landlord shall be required for the purpose of eviction of a residential tenant.

This section shall not apply to a tenancy where the rental period is for less than fourteen (14) days.

Notwithstanding § 66-7-107 or this section to the contrary, three (3) days' notice by a landlord is sufficient notice of termination of tenancy to evict a residential tenant in a housing authority created pursuant to title 13, chapter 20, part 4 or 5, or a residential tenant, who is not mentally or physically disabled, in a rental property located in any county not governed by the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act, compiled in chapter 28 of this title, if the tenant, in either case, or any other person on the premises with the tenant's consent, willfully or intentionally:

Commits a violent act;

Engages in any drug-related criminal activity; or

Behaves in a manner that constitutes or threatens to be a real and present danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the life or property of other tenants, the landlord, the landlord's representatives, or other persons on the premises.

If domestic abuse, as defined in § 36-3-601, is the underlying offense for which a tenancy is terminated, only the perpetrator may be evicted. The landlord shall not evict the victims, minor children under eighteen (18) years of age, or innocent occupants, any of whom occupy the subject premises under a lease agreement, based solely on the domestic abuse. Even if evicted or removed from the lease, the perpetrator shall remain financially liable for all amounts due under all terms and conditions of the present lease agreement.

If a lease agreement is in effect, the landlord may remove the perpetrator from the lease agreement and require the remaining adult tenants to qualify for and enter into a new agreement for the remainder of the present lease term. The landlord shall not be responsible for any and all damages suffered by the perpetrator due to the bifurcation and termination of the lease agreement in accordance with this section.

If domestic abuse, as defined in § 36-3-601, is the underlying offense for which tenancy could be terminated, the victim and all adult tenants shall agree, in writing, not to allow the perpetrator to return to the subject premises or any part of the community property, and to immediately report the perpetrator's return to the proper authority, for the remainder of the tenancy. A violation of such agreement shall be cause to terminate tenancy as to the victim and all other tenants.

The rights under this section shall not apply until the victim has been judicially granted an order of protection against the perpetrator for the specific incident for which tenancy is being terminated, a copy of such order has been provided to the landlord, and the order:

Provides for the perpetrator to move out or vacate immediately;

Prohibits the perpetrator from coming by or to a shared residence;

Requires that the perpetrator stay away from the victim's residence; or

Finds that the perpetrator's continuing to reside in the rented or leased premises may jeopardize the life, health, and safety of the victim or the victim's minor children.

Failure to comply with this section, or dismissal of an order of protection that allows application of this section, abrogates the rights provided to the victim, minor children, and innocent occupants under this section.

The rights granted in this section shall not apply in any situation where the perpetrator is a child or dependent of any tenant.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the eviction of a victim of domestic abuse for non-payment of rent, a lease violation, or any violation of this chapter.

Three-days' notice by a landlord is sufficient notice of termination of tenancy for the purpose of eviction of an unauthorized subtenant or other unauthorized occupant, if the termination of tenancy is for refusal by the unauthorized subtenant or other unauthorized occupant to vacate the premises.

Nothing in this section shall apply to rental property located in any county governed by the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Acts 1999, ch. 451, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 75, § 1; 2015, ch. 172, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 895, § 2; 2018, ch. 960, § 1; 2019, ch. 236, § 2; 2020, ch. 528, § 2.

Compiler's Notes Acts 2015, ch. 172, § 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all residential leases entered into or renewed on or after April 16, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 895, § 2 purported to add new subsections (e) and (f); however, the text of subsection (f) already existed as former subsection (e).

Acts 2018, ch. 960, § 4 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to any rental agreement entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 6 provided that the act shall apply to any rental agreement entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2019, and any request for an exception to a landlord's policy that prohibits or limits animals on the property made on or after July 1, 2019.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment substituted “Except as provided in this section, fourteen (14) days’ notice” for “Fourteen (14) days’ notice” in (a); and rewrote (d), which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §66-7-107 or this section to the contrary, three (3) days' notice by a landlord shall be sufficient notice of termination of tenancy for the purpose of eviction of a residential tenant in a housing authority created pursuant to title 13, chapter 20, part 4 or 5, if the tenant or any other person on the premises with the tenant's consent willfully or intentionally commits a violent act, or has engaged in any drug-related criminal activity, or behaves in a manner that constitutes or threatens to be a real and present danger to the health, safety or welfare of the life or property of other tenants, the landlord, the landlord's representatives or other persons on the premises.”

The 2016 amendment added (e) and (f).

The 2018 amendment added (g).

The 2019 amendment deleted former (g), which read: “(g)(1) It is deemed to be material noncompliance and default by the tenant with the rental agreement, if the tenant pretends to have a disability-related need for an assistance animal in order to obtain an exception to a provision in a rental agreement that prohibits pets or establishes limits on the types of pets that tenants may possess on residential rental property. As used in this subsection (g), ‘assistance animal’ means an animal that works, provides assistance, or performs tasks for the benefit of a person with a disability, or provides emotional support that alleviates one (1) or more identified symptoms or effects of a person's disability.“(2) The landlord may recover damages and obtain injunctive relief for any noncompliance and default by the tenant with the rental agreement under this subsection (g). The landlord may recover reasonable attorney's fees for breach of contract and nonpayment of rent as provided in the rental agreement.“(3) A provision in a rental agreement that authorizes a landlord to hold a tenant in breach or default of the rental agreement in accordance with this subsection (g) is not unconscionable and is fully enforceable.”

The 2020 amendment added (f) and redesignated former (f) as (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 172, § 3. April 16, 2015.

Acts 2016, ch. 895, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 960, § 4. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 6. July 1, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 528, § 3. July 1, 2020.

66-7-110. Rental termination rights for persons with physical disabilities.

A person with a physical disability shall be permitted to terminate a rental lease relative to such person's primary residence without incurring penalties or being obligated to pay rent after ceasing to occupy the property if such person is accepted as a resident of a public housing facility, unless the person's current landlord has made significant modifications to the residence to address issues of accessibility for persons with a physical disability. The person with a physical disability who terminates a rental lease pursuant to this section shall present written evidence of the public housing facility acceptance to the rental leaseholder and the rental leaseholder shall provide written acknowledgement of the lease termination to the lessee. For the purposes of this section, a “person with a physical disability” means a person who meets the standard for being “permanently and totally disabled” under §71-4-1102.

Acts 2001, ch. 169, § 1; 2011, ch. 47, § 70.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. Aid to disabled persons, general financial assistance, title 71, ch. 4, part 11.

Aid to disabled persons, personal care services subsidies, title 71, ch. 4, part 12.

66-7-111. Exception to policy prohibiting or limiting, or requiring payment for, animals or pets for tenant or prospective tenant with disability who requires use of service animal or support animal.

As used in this section:

“Disability” means:

A physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one (1) or more major life activities;

A record of an impairment described in subdivision (a)(1)(A); or

Being regarded as having an impairment described in subdivision (a)(1)(A);

“Health care” means any care, treatment, service, or procedure to maintain, diagnose, or treat an individual's physical or mental condition;

“Healthcare provider” means a person who is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by the laws of any state to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession;

“Reliable documentation” means written documentation provided by:

A healthcare provider with actual knowledge of an individual's disability;

An individual or entity with a valid, unrestricted license, certification, or registration to serve persons with disabilities with actual knowledge of an individual's disability; or

A caregiver, reliable third party, or a governmental entity with actual knowledge of an individual's disability;

“Service animal” means a dog or miniature horse that has been individually trained to work or perform tasks for an individual with a disability; and

“Support animal” means an animal selected to accompany an individual with a disability that has been prescribed or recommended by a healthcare provider to work, provide assistance, or perform tasks for the benefit of the individual with a disability, or provide emotional support that alleviates one (1) or more identified symptoms or effects of the individual's disability.

A tenant or prospective tenant with a disability who requires the use of a service animal or support animal may request an exception to a landlord's policy that prohibits or limits animals or pets on the premises or that requires any payment by a tenant to have an animal or pet on the premises.

A landlord who receives a request made under subsection (b) from a tenant or prospective tenant may ask that the individual, whose disability is not readily apparent or known to the landlord, submit reliable documentation of a disability and the disability-related need for a service animal or support animal. If the disability is readily apparent or known but the disability-related need for the service animal or support animal is not, then the landlord may ask the individual to submit reliable documentation of the disability-related need for a service animal or support animal.

A landlord who receives reliable documentation under subsection (c) may verify the reliable documentation. However, nothing in this subsection (d) authorizes a landlord to obtain confidential or protected medical records or confidential or protected medical information concerning a tenant's or prospective tenant's disability.

A landlord may deny a request made under subsection (b) if a tenant or prospective tenant fails to provide accurate, reliable documentation that meets the requirements of subsection (c), after the landlord requests the reliable documentation.

It is deemed to be material noncompliance and default by the tenant with the rental agreement, if the tenant:

Misrepresents that there is a disability or disability-related need for the use of a service animal or support animal; or

Provides documentation under subsection (c) that falsely states an animal is a service animal or support animal.

In the event of any violation under subdivision (f)(1), the landlord may terminate the tenancy and recover damages, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney's fees.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a landlord is not liable for injuries by a person's service animal or support animal permitted on the premises as a reasonable accommodation to assist the person with a disability pursuant to the Fair Housing Act, as amended, (42 U.S.C. §§ 3601 et seq.); the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq.); Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, (29 U.S.C. § 701); or any other federal, state, or local law.

Only to the extent it conflicts with federal or state law, this section does not apply to public housing units owned by a governmental entity.

Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 6 provided that the act shall apply to any rental agreement entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2019, and any request for an exception to a landlord's policy that prohibits or limits animals on the property made on or after July 1, 2019.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 236, § 6. July 1, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.